Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-828.03
Coordinator; duties.

The State Fire Marshal shall serve as the coordinator of the Wildland Incident Response Assistance Team and shall:

(1) Establish squads within the team and select a squad leader and squad members for each squad. The State Fire Marshal may consult with the State Forester when establishing a squad, selecting a squad leader, or selecting a squad member. The State Fire Marshal is limited to selecting squad leaders and squad members from employees of the State Fire Marshal and employees of the Nebraska Forest Service;

(2) Maintain a roster of all individuals who are a part of the Wildland Incident Response Assistance Team; and

(3) Establish standards for the operation, training, equipment, and administration of the Wildland Incident Response Assistance Team. It is the intent of the Legislature that such standards should comply with the standards established by the National Wildfire Coordinating Group or its successor.

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 22.
July 19, 2024